Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 46.30.020 and 2019 c 60 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) No person may operate a motor vehicle subject to registration under chapter 46.16A RCW in this state unless the person is insured under a motor vehicle liability policy with liability limits of at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090, is self-insured as provided in RCW 46.29.630, is covered by a certificate of deposit in conformance with RCW 46.29.550, or is covered by a liability bond of at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090. Proof of financial responsibility for motor vehicle operation must be provided on the request of a law enforcement officer in the format specified under RCW 46.30.030.(b) A person who drives a motor vehicle that is required to be registered in another state that requires drivers and owners of vehicles in that state to maintain insurance or financial responsibility shall, when requested by a law enforcement officer, provide evidence of financial responsibility or insurance as is required by the laws of the state in which the vehicle is registered.(c) When asked to do so by a law enforcement officer, failure to display proof of financial responsibility for motor vehicle operation as specified under RCW 46.30.030 creates a presumption that the person does not have motor vehicle insurance.(d) Failure to provide proof of motor vehicle insurance is a traffic infraction and is subject to penalties as set by the supreme court under RCW 46.63.110 or community restitution.(e) For the purposes of this section, when a person uses a portable electronic device to display proof of financial security to a law enforcement officer, the officer may only view the proof of financial security and is otherwise prohibited from viewing any other content on the portable electronic device.(f) Whenever a person presents a portable electronic device pursuant to this section, that person assumes all liability for any damage to the portable electronic device.(2) If a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this section appears in person before the court or a violations bureau and provides written evidence that at the time the person was cited, he or she was in compliance with the financial responsibility requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the citation shall be dismissed and the court or violations bureau may assess court administrative costs of ((twenty-five dollars))$25 at the time of dismissal. In lieu of personal appearance, a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this section may, before the date scheduled for the person's appearance before the court or violations bureau, submit by mail to the court or violations bureau written evidence that at the time the person was cited, he or she was in compliance with the financial responsibility requirements of subsection (1) of this section, in which case the citation shall be dismissed without cost, except that the court or violations bureau may assess court administrative costs of ((twenty-five dollars))$25 at the time of dismissal.(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not govern:(a) The operation of a motor vehicle ((registered under RCW 46.18.220 or 46.18.255,)) governed by RCW 46.16A.170((,)) or registered with the Washington utilities and transportation commission as common or contract carriers; or(b) The operation of a motor-driven cycle as defined in RCW 46.04.332, a moped as defined in RCW 46.04.304, or a wheeled all-terrain vehicle as defined in RCW 46.09.310.(4) RCW 46.29.490 shall not be deemed to govern all motor vehicle liability policies required by this chapter but only those certified for the purposes stated in chapter 46.29 RCW.Sec. 2. RCW 46.04.199 and 2017 c 147 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:"Horseless carriage license plate" is a special license plate that may be assigned to a vehicle ((that is at least forty years old))manufactured or built before January 1, 1916, and meets the qualifications listed in RCW 46.18.255.Sec. 3. RCW 46.18.255 and 2020 c 18 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A registered owner may apply to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director for a horseless carriage license plate for a motor vehicle that is ((at least forty years old))manufactured or built before January 1, 1916. The motor vehicle must be operated primarily as a collector vehicle and be in good running order. The applicant for the horseless carriage license plate shall:(a) Purchase a registration for the motor vehicle as required under chapters 46.16A and 46.17 RCW; and(b) Pay the special license plate fee established under RCW 46.17.220(11), in addition to any other fees or taxes required by law.(2) Horseless carriage license plates:(a) Are valid for the life of the motor vehicle;(b) Are not required to be renewed;(c) Are not transferable to any other motor vehicle; and(d) Must be displayed on the rear of the motor vehicle.Sec. 4. RCW 46.18.220 and 2024 c 131 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A registered owner may apply to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director for a collector vehicle license plate for a motor vehicle or travel trailer that is at least 30 years old. The motor vehicle must be operated primarily as a collector vehicle and be in good running order. The applicant for the collector vehicle license plate shall:(a) After January 15, 2026, provide proof of ownership and a valid registration certificate for a second vehicle that will be used for daily driving, commuting, or business purposes;(b) After January 15, 2026, provide proof of a current vehicle liability insurance policy or collector vehicle insurance policy for the vehicle being registered, with liability limits of at least the amounts listed under RCW 46.29.090;(c) Purchase a registration for the motor vehicle or travel trailer as required under chapters 46.16A and 46.17 RCW; and(((b)))(d) Pay the special license plate fee established under RCW 46.17.220(5), in addition to any other fees or taxes required by law.(2) A person applying for a collector vehicle license plate may:(a) Receive a collector vehicle license plate assigned by the department; or(b) Provide an actual Washington state issued license plate designated for general use in the year of the vehicle's manufacture.(3) Collector vehicle license plates:(a) Are valid for the life of the motor vehicle or travel trailer;(b) Are not required to be renewed; and(c) Must be displayed on the rear of the motor vehicle or travel trailer.(4) A collector vehicle registered under this section may only be used for participation in club activities, exhibitions, tours, parades, and occasional pleasure driving.(5) Collector vehicle license plates under subsection (2)(b) of this section may be transferred from one vehicle to another vehicle described in subsection (1) of this section upon application to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director.(6) A person driving a motor vehicle with a collector vehicle license plate must maintain collector vehicle insurance with respect to the vehicle and comply with all requirements of chapter 46.30 RCW.(7) Any person who knowingly provides a false or facsimile license plate under subsection (2)(b) of this section is subject to a traffic infraction and fine in an amount equal to the monetary penalty for a violation of RCW 46.16A.200(7)(b). Additionally, the person must pay for the cost of a collector vehicle license plate as listed in RCW 46.17.220(5), unless already paid.(((7)))(8) A collector vehicle that is a motor vehicle may tow a trailer if the trailer is being used for participation in club activities, exhibitions, tours, and parades.(9) Any person who does not meet the requirements of subsections (1) through (8) of this section must surrender the current license plate or plates to the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director. A person whose collector vehicle registration has been canceled may operate the vehicle once the applicable requirements of chapters 46.16A and 46.17 RCW have been satisfied.(10) The department is authorized to make exceptions to the requirements under subsection (1)(a) of this section if the owner demonstrates to the department's satisfaction that the owner has alternative means for addressing the owner's regular transportation needs.(11) The requirements of subsections (1)(b) and (6) of this section apply only when the collector vehicle is operated on a public highway pursuant to RCW 46.30.020.(12) The department shall adopt rules to define collector vehicle insurance for the purposes of this section.Sec. 5. RCW 46.16A.070 and 2011 c 171 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department may refuse to issue or may cancel a registration certificate at any time when the department determines that an applicant for registration is not entitled to a registration certificate. Notice of cancellation may be accomplished by sending a notice by first-class mail using the last known address in department records for the registered or legal owner or owners, and completing an affidavit of first-class mail. It is unlawful for any person to remove, drive, or operate the vehicle until a proper registration certificate has been issued. A person removing, driving, or operating a vehicle after the refusal to issue or cancellation of the registration is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.(2)(a) The suspension, revocation, cancellation, or refusal by the director of a registration certificate provided under this chapter is conclusive unless the person whose registration or certificate is suspended, revoked, canceled, or refused appeals to the superior court of Thurston county or the person's county of residence.(b) Notice of appeal must be filed within ((ten))10 days after receipt of the notice of suspension, revocation, cancellation, or refusal. Upon the filing of the notice of appeal, the court shall issue an order to the director to show cause why the registration should not be granted or reinstated and return the order not less than ((ten))10 days after the date of service to the director. Service must be in the same manner as prescribed for the service of a summons and complaint in other civil actions.(c) Upon the hearing on the order to show cause, the court shall hear evidence concerning matters with reference to the suspension, revocation, cancellation, or refusal of the registration and shall enter judgment either affirming or setting aside the suspension, revocation, cancellation, or refusal.(3) The department may cancel the registration of a vehicle registered under RCW 46.18.220 if the registered owner fails to respond to a request for information from the department regarding collector vehicle insurance and whether collector plates are in use, within 45 days. The request for information shall include a statement with the necessary information and deadline for compliance, as well as the consequences of failure to respond to the request for information.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. This act takes effect January 15, 2026.--- END ---